Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1755
Purchaser rights; cumulative.

The rights of the purchaser set forth in sections 59-1752 to 59-1754 shall be cumulative to all other rights under the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act or otherwise.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 55;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 22.